Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB718.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible conviction" means an offense that is not an offense that would
classify a person as a violent offender as defined in KRS 439.3401; and
(b) "Expungeable conviction" means any eligible conviction if:
1. Five (5) years have passed since the completion of any term of
incarceration and any other conditions of release; and
2. The person has not in the previous five (5) years been convicted of a
felony or misdemeanor.
(2) On August 1, 2026, and on the first day of each month thereafter, the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall
identify eligible convictions that have not been expunged.
(3) On August 15, 2026, and on the fifteenth day of each month thereafter, the
Administrative Office of the Courts shall produce a list of eligible convictions that
are expungeable convictions, and shall communicate each expungeable
conviction to the court in which the conviction occurred.
(4) (a) Within thirty (30) days of receipt of a notice of an expungeable conviction,
the court shall order the judgment vacated, dismiss with prejudice any
charges that are eligible for expungement under this section, and order
expunged all records in the custody of the court and any records in the
custody of any other agency or official, including law enforcement records.
(b) The order expunging the records shall not require any action by the person
with the expungable conviction.
(c) Upon entry of an order expunging a conviction pursuant to this section, the
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/24/2026 12:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2199
court shall notify the person of the expungement.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/24/2026 12:48 PM Jacketed